Georgia, session 2025_26, HB749.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act amending, revising, superseding, and consolidating the laws pertaining to the Board
of Commissioners of Carroll County, approved February 28, 1989 (Ga. L. 1989, p. 3546),
as amended, is amended by revising Section 7 as follows:
"SECTION 7.
Compensation.
(a) The chairman shall receive an annual salary payable in equal monthly installments
from funds of Carroll County. Such annual salary shall be equal to the base annual salary
H. B. 749
- 1 -

LC 44 3127/AP
and annual cost-of-living adjustment of the sheriff of Carroll County as computed under
paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 15-16-20 of the O.C.G.A., plus
$25,000.00. Such annual salary shall also be increased by a longevity increase as provided
by Code Section 36-5-29 of the O.C.G.A. The chairman shall also be furnished with the
use of an automobile provided by the county at county expense.
(b) Each member of the commission other than the chairperson shall receive an annual
salary of $20,250.00, payable in equal monthly installments from funds of Carroll County.
Members of the commission shall be treated as full-time salary employees for the purposes
of cost-of-living increases. On and after July 1, 2025, whenever Carroll County employees
receive a cost-of-living increase, the annual base salary of the commissioners shall be
increased by the greater, of either the same percentage or the same amount applicable to
such full-time salary employees or the percentage or amount provided for under Code
Section 36-5-28 of the O.C.G.A., whichever is greater for the applicable calendar year. If
the cost-of-living increase received by such full-time salary county employees is in
different percentages or different amounts as to certain categories of such full-time salary
employees, the amount to which the commissioners are entitled, if applicable under this
subsection, shall be increased by a percentage or an amount not to exceed the average
percentage or average amount of the increase in salary granted to such full-time salary
county employees. A budget resolution may state the average percentage increase or
average amount increase when necessary.
(c) In addition to said salaries, the chairman shall receive an expense allowance of
$7,700.00 per year from county funds, and each other member of the commission shall
receive an expense allowance of $3,100.00 per year from funds of Carroll County.
(d) The amounts set forth in paragraphs (a) through (c) of this section shall be subject to
annual adjustments as provided for under Code Section 36-5-28 of the O.C.G.A., except
that if the increase is a dollar amount, then it shall be converted to a percentage by dividing
the amount by the average full-time salary of Carroll County employees."
H. B. 749
- 2 -

LC 44 3127/AP
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended by revising paragraph (22) of subsection (a) of Section 8 as
follows:
"(22) To authorize all contracts, except for contracts of employment, involving the
expenditure of county funds in excess of $35,000.00. The amount set forth in this
paragraph shall be subject to annual adjustments based on changes in the Consumer Price
Index (CPI) for the United States. The CPI used for this purpose shall be the All Urban
Consumers (CPI-U) for All Items for the United States, as published by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. On July 1, 2025, and each
anniversary thereof, the amount authorized by this paragraph for the following fiscal year
shall be increased by the percentage increase in the CPI for the most recent 12-month
period available prior to the anniversary date. Any increase resulting from this provision
shall be rounded to the nearest dollar."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 749
- 3 -